District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.19n

Family assessment plan.

Within 180 days of April 8, 2011, the Mayor shall submit to the Council a plan, with timetables and budget requirements, to assess every family and to offer supportive services and job training opportunities for the TANF program, starting with all present and subsequent families that have been on the program beyond 60 months, and to transition all families beyond 60 months from the program within 5 years.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 519n
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-366, § 2(e), 58 DCR 981
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 32(b), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a stylistic change in the section heading.